Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 5. Continuation of Employment During Probation

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court to impose sentence providing for intermittent incarceration, 39 ALR2d 985.

United States Parole Commission Guidelines for federal prisoners, 61 ALR Fed 135.

§ 7-13-501.
Power of court to allow; confinement when not working.

As a condition of probation in any misdemeanor case, or as a condition of probation granted under W.S. 7-13-107(b)(ii), the sentencing court may allow an employed defendant to continue to work at his employment and provide that when the defendant is not employed, and between the hours or periods of his employment, he shall be confined in the county jail. As a condition of special treatment under this section, the court shall require the defendant to pay a reasonable amount for room and board as determined by the sheriff.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 135, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 7-342; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-502

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1989, ch. 91, § 1; 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

§ 7-13-502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 135, § 3, related to the collection and disposition of earnings.

§ 7-13-503.
Work arrangement in another county.

The court may by order authorize the sheriff of the county in which probation is granted to arrange with another sheriff for the defendant granted probation under W.S.

7-13-501

to work at his employment in the other county, and to be confined in the county jail of the other county between the hours or periods when he is not working at his employment.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 135, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 7-346; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-506; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to county sheriffs, see §

18-3-601

et seq.

§ 7-13-504.
Persons committed for contempt of court.

A person committed to the county jail for contempt of court may be granted probation to continue his employment as provided by W.S.

7-13-501

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 135, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 7-347; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-507; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.